Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Examiners in Optometry.

Administrative Code. —

For board of examiners in optometry, see 12 AAC 48.

Sec. 08.72.010.
Creation and purpose of board.

There is created the Board of Examiners in Optometry to regulate and control the practice of optometry and to protect and promote the public health, welfare, and safety.

History.

(§ 35-3-132 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.72.020.
Membership of board.

The board consists of five persons.

History.

(§ 35-3-132 ACLA 1949; am § 22 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For appointment and terms, see AS

08.01.035

.

Sec. 08.72.025.
Removal of board members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.72.030.
Vacancies. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.72.040.
Qualifications.

Four board members shall be licensed, practicing optometrists who have been residents for at least three years.
One board member shall be a public member.

History.

(§ 35-3-132 ACLA 1949; am § 23 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 38 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.72.050.
Regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations

necessary for the proper performance of its duties;

governing the applicants and applications for licensing;

for the licensing of optometrists;

necessary to govern the practice of optometry, including the prescription and use of pharmaceutical agents for the treatment of eye disease;

prescribing requirements that a person licensed under this chapter must meet to demonstrate continued professional competency;

developing uniform standards for the practice of optometry.

History.

(§ 35-3-133 ACLA 1949; am § 6 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 48, art. 2.

For standards of practice, see 12 AAC 48, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 24, 2017, in (4), added “, including the prescription and use of pharmaceutical agents for the treatment of eye disease” at the end; added (6).

Sec. 08.72.060.
Miscellaneous powers and duties of board.

The board or a member designated by the board may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take testimony concerning any matter within the board’s jurisdiction.

The board may

adopt a seal;

define professional conduct and adopt rules of professional conduct.

The board shall

elect a chair and secretary from among its members;

order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical examination if the licensee’s physical capacity to practice safely is at issue;

require that a licensee who has a federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200(n)

;

publish advisory opinions regarding whether optometry practice procedures or policies comply with acceptable standards of the practice of optometry, as provided under this chapter.

[Repealed by § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

[Repealed by § 23 ch 75 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed by § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

History.

(§§ 35-3-133, 35-3-140 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966; am §§ 7, 8, 23 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 2006; am § 11 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 17 SLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1998, “the board’s” was inserted in place of “its” at the end of subsection (a) to correct a grammatical error.

Administrative Code. —

For standards of practice, see 12 AAC 48, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 17, 2017, added (c)(3).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 27, 2017, added paragraph (c)(4). Although the 2017 amendment was to have taken effect July 17, 2017, under § 7, ch. 17, SLA 2017, the governor did not sign the bill until July 26, 2017, and so under AS

01.10.070(d)

the actual effective date of the 2017 amendment was July 27, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

The delayed repeal of paragraph (c)(3) of this section by sec. 52,
ch. 25, SLA 2016, which was to take effect July 1, 2021, was repealed by sec. 47,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017.

Sec. 08.72.070.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act. [Repealed, § 23 ch 75 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.72.080.
Compensation of board and secretary. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.72.090.
Record of proceedings. [Repealed, § 23 ch 75 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.72.100.
Bond of secretary. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]